Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2425
City or village ordinance; not preempted.

Any city or village ordinance existing on September 6, 1991, shall not be preempted by sections 69-2401 to 69-2425.

Laws 1991, LB 355, § 24;

Laws 1996, LB 1055, § 10.